Maine, session 132, LD693.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
SECRETARY OF STATE, DEPARTMENT OF
Bureau of Corporations, Elections and Commissions 0692
Initiative: Establishes 3 Office Specialist II positions and provides funding for All Other.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 3.000 3.000
Personal Services $350,430 $363,045
All Other $29,647 $8,602
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $380,077 $371,647
Page 1 - 132LR1851(03)